Wyoming, session 2025, HB0284.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-2-915 is created to read:

35-2-915. Minimum general acute hospital and critical
care access hospital services.

HB0284

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0680
(a) A hospital licensed through the department and
whose support, either in whole or in part, is derived from
public funds and provides inpatient acute care shall:

(i) Offer the following minimum services as
defined by the department:

(A) Emergency services;

(B) Radiology services;

(C) Laboratory services; and

(D) Nursing services.

(ii) Offer, subject to the waiver provision of
subsection (b) of this section, obstetrics, labor and
delivery services.

(b) A hospital licensed by the department whose
support, either in whole or in part, is derived from public
funds and that seeks to waive the requirement to offer
obstetrics, labor and delivery services under paragraph
HB0284

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0680
(a)(ii) of this section shall submit an application to the
department. The application shall include:

(i) Sufficient information to demonstrate one of
the following:

(A) Continued maintenance of obstetrics,
labor and delivery services would place undue financial
hardship on the hospital;

(B) That patient volume for the obstetrics,
labor and delivery services is too low to ensure staff
competency and availability; or

(C) Personnel, equipment or medical
expertise necessary to provide obstetrics, labor and
delivery services are not reasonably available at the
hospital.

(ii) A signed letter from the board of county
commissioners in the county where the hospital is located
if the hospital is operated by the state or a political
subdivision of the state, or, if a publicly owned hospital,
HB0284

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0680
a signed letter from the applicable hospital board of
trustees, that:

(A) Attests to the fact that the waived
obstetrics, labor and delivery services cannot be provided
at the hospital, pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this
section; and

(B) Concurs with the hospital's rationale
for requesting the waiver.

(c) When a complete application for a waiver is
submitted, the department shall make a determination on the
waiver not later than thirty (30) calendar days after
receiving the application. The department may waive the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section if the
elements of paragraph (b)(i) of this section are proven by
the applicable hospital.

(d) As used in this section, "hospital" means as
defined by W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xiii)(A) and
35-2-901(a)(xiii)(C).

HB0284

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0680
Section 2. W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xxvii) is amended to
read:

35-2-901. Definitions; applicability of provisions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xxvii) "This act" means W.S. 35-2-901 through
35-2-914 35-2-915.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0284